Connecticut, session 2026, HB05348.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 4-168 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026, and applicable to regulations noticed on and after said date):
(a) Except as provided in subsections (g) and (h) of this section, an
agency, not less than thirty days prior to adopting a proposed
regulation, shall (1) post a notice of its intended action on the
eRegulations System, which notice shall include (A) a specified public
comment period of not less than thirty days, (B) a description
sufficiently detailed so as to apprise persons likely to be affected of the
issues and subjects involved in the proposed regulation, (C) a statement
of the purposes for which the regulation is proposed, (D) a reference to
the statutory authority for the proposed regulation, (E) when, where
sHB5348 / File No. 196 1

sHB5348 File No. 196
and how interested persons may obtain a copy of the small business
impact and regulatory flexibility analysis required pursuant to section
4-168a, and (F) when, where and how interested persons may present
their views on the proposed regulation; (2) post a copy of the proposed
regulation on the eRegulations System; (3) give notice electronically to
each joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of the subject matter of the proposed regulation, the speaker
of the House of Representatives, the president pro tempore of the Senate
and the majority and minority leaders of the House Representatives and
Senate; (4) prior to January 1, 2017, give notice electronically or provide
a paper copy notice, if requested, to all persons who have made requests
to the agency for advance notice of its regulation-making proceedings;
(5) provide a paper copy or electronic version of the proposed regulation
to persons requesting it; and (6) prepare a fiscal note, including an
estimate of the cost or of the revenue impact (A) on the state or any
municipality of the state, and (B) on small businesses in the state,
including an estimate of the number of small businesses subject to the
proposed regulation and the projected costs, including, but not limited
to, reporting, recordkeeping and administrative, associated with
compliance with the proposed regulation and, if applicable, the
regulatory flexibility analysis prepared under section 4-168a. The
governing body of any municipality, if requested, shall provide the
agency, within twenty working days, with any information that may be
necessary for analysis in preparation of such fiscal note. On and after
January 1, 2017, each such agency shall mail a paper copy of the notice
posted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, not later than five
days after posting such notice, to any person who has requested
advance notice of the agency's regulation-making proceedings on or
after October 1, 2016.
Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 29-252b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026, and applicable to any code noticed on and after said date):
(c) Prior to the adoption of the State Building Code and any
amendments thereto, the State Building Inspector shall (1) post any
sHB5348 / File No. 196 2

sHB5348 File No. 196
proposed code, a statement of purpose for which the proposed code is
proposed, a fiscal note associated with compliance with the proposed
code prepared pursuant to section 4-168, as amended by this act, and a
regulatory flexibility analysis prepared pursuant to section 4-168a on
the Internet web site of the Department of Administrative Services, (2)
give notice electronically to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and
security, the speaker of the House of Representatives, the president pro
tempore of the Senate and the majority and minority leaders of the
House Representatives and Senate, (3) give notice to any person who
has requested the State Building Inspector for advance notice of its
proposed code adoption proceedings, (4) provide for a public comment
period of forty-five days following the posting of such proposed code,
fiscal note and regulatory flexibility analysis, and (5) hold a public
hearing on the proposed code not less than twenty nor more than thirty-
five days after such posting.
Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 29-291e of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026, and applicable to any code noticed on and after said date):
(c) Prior to the adoption of the State Fire Prevention Code and any
amendments thereto, the State Fire Marshal shall (1) post any proposed
code, a statement of purpose for which the proposed code is proposed,
a fiscal note associated with compliance with the proposed code
prepared pursuant to section 4-168, as amended by this act, and a
regulatory flexibility analysis prepared pursuant to section 4-168a on
the Internet web site of the Department of Administrative Services, (2)
give notice electronically to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and
security, the speaker of the House of Representatives, the president pro
tempore of the Senate and the majority and minority leaders of the
House Representatives and Senate, (3) give notice to any person who
has requested the State Fire Marshal for advance notice of the proposed
code adoption proceedings, (4) provide for a public comment period of
forty-five days following the posting of such proposed code, fiscal note
sHB5348 / File No. 196 3

sHB5348 File No. 196
and regulatory flexibility analysis, and (5) hold a public hearing on the
proposed code not less than twenty nor more than thirty-five days after
such posting.
Sec. 4. Subsection (c) of section 29-292a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026, and applicable to any code noticed on and after said date):
(c) Prior to the adoption of the Fire Safety Code and any amendments
thereto, the State Fire Marshal shall (1) post any proposed code, a
statement of purpose for which the proposed code is proposed, a fiscal
note associated with compliance with the proposed code prepared
pursuant to section 4-168, as amended by this act, and a regulatory
flexibility analysis prepared pursuant to section 4-168a on the Internet
web site of the Department of Administrative Services, (2) give notice
electronically to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and security, the
speaker of the House of Representatives, the president pro tempore of
the Senate and the majority and minority leaders of the House
Representatives and Senate, (3) give notice to any person who has
requested the State Fire Marshal for advance notice of the proposed code
100 adoption proceedings, (4) provide for a public comment period of forty-
101 five days following the posting of such proposed code, fiscal note and
102 regulatory flexibility analysis, and (5) hold a public hearing on the
103 proposed code not less than twenty nor more than thirty-five days after
104 such posting.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026, and 4-168(a)
applicable to regulations
noticed on and after said
date
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026, and 29-252b(c)
applicable to any code
noticed on and after said
date
sHB5348 / File No. 196 4

sHB5348 File No. 196
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026, and 29-291e(c)
applicable to any code
noticed on and after said
date
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026, and 29-292a(c)
applicable to any code
noticed on and after said
date
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Throughout the bill, "majority and minority leaders of the House" was
changed to "majority and minority leaders of the House of
Representatives" for statutory consistency.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5348 / File No. 196 5

sHB5348 File No. 196
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires additional legislative leaders to be notified
by agencies when there are changes in certain regulations and codes,
results in no fiscal impact to the state.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5348 / File No. 196 6

sHB5348 File No. 196
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5348
AN ACT REQUIRING NOTIFICATION TO THE LEGISLATIVE
LEADERS OF THE PROPOSED ADOPTION OF AGENCY
REGULATIONS AND THE STATE BUILDING AND FIRE CODES.